Washington statutes.
RCW 43.190.065

Local and state long-term care ombuds—Duties and authority in federal older Americans act.

A local long-term care ombuds, including a trained volunteer long-term care ombuds, shall have the duties and authority set forth in the federal older Americans act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3058 et seq.) for local ombuds. The state long-term care ombuds and representatives of the office of the state long-term care ombuds, shall have the duties and authority set forth in the federal older Americans act for the state long-term care ombuds and representatives of the office of the state long-term care ombuds.

[ 2013 c 23 s 93; 1999 c 133 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1999 c 133: See notes following RCW 43.190.060.